src/morphology/stems/prefixes.lexc
!! Prefixes
!  --------
!! Prefixes in the Lushootseed language are bound to beginning of other words.

LEXICON Prefixes
@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     Nouns   ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<     Nouns   ;
 Nouns ;
! These are the first Northern Lushootseed
@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     N_NEWWORDS   ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<     N_NEWWORDS   ;
 N_NEWWORDS ;
verbprefix-     Verbs   ;
@U.TAM.COND@:@U.TAM.COND@ləs%< Verbs ;
@U.TAM.FUT@:@U.TAM.FUT@ɬu%< Verbs ; ! qəlb 'rain': ɬuqəlb 'rain in the future' is this a noun, too?
@U.TAM.PRF@:@U.TAM.PRF@ʔu%< Verbs ; ! qəlb 'rain': ʔuqəlb 'raining' doesn't sound perfect to me
@U.TAM.REM@:@U.TAM.REM@tu%< Verbs ;
@U.TAM.PROG@:@U.TAM.PROG@lə%< Verbs ;
@U.TAM.STAT@:@U.TAM.STAT@ʔəs%< Verbs ;
!ʔəsq̓iʔq̓aƛ̕əb _partly cloudy_ ɬasq̓iʔq̓aƛ̕əb __partly cloudy in the future__
!ʔəsgiʔgəqəb __partly sunny__ ɬasgiʔgəqəb __partly sunny in the future__
!ʔiɬgəqil __mostly sunny__ ɬasʔiɬgəqil __mostly sunny in the future__
!ʔəsgəqəb __sunny__ ɬasgəqil __sunny in the future__
!
@U.PossPx.Sg1@:@U.PossPx.Sg1@d%<     DVNouns   ;
@U.PossPx.Sg2@:@U.PossPx.Sg2@ad%<     DVNouns   ;
 DVNouns   ;

LEXICON DVNouns
:s%< Verbs ;

! vim: set ft=xfst-lexc:
